Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4305
Tax; due and payable; when.

The tax imposed upon marijuana and controlled substances by section 77-4303 shall be due and payable immediately upon acquisition or possession of marijuana and controlled substances in this state by a dealer.

Laws 1990, LB 260, § 5.